Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB92.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 63 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3109.1. Application form for licenses, certificates, registrations and permits.No later than 120 days after the effective date of this section, the commissioner or a designee of the commissioner, in conjunction with each licensing board and commission, shall ensure that a paper application is available for an individual who meets all of the following criteria: (1) The individual is applying for an initial license, certificate, registration or permit or a renewal of a license, certificate, registration or permit from a licensing 123456789101112131415161718 board or commission.(2) The individual objects to submitting an electronic application to a licensing board or commission based on the individual's religious or personal conviction.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0092PN0075 - 2 - 12345